Massachusetts, session 194th, S2963.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 147 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended in Section 2 by striking
out the words "June 30, 2028" and inserting in place thereof the following words: "June 30,
2033."
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1